Utah statutes.
76-3-207.7.   First degree felony aggravated murder -- Noncapital felony --
Penalties -- Sentenced by court.
(1)  A person who has pled guilty to or been convicted of first degree felony
aggravated murder under Section 76-5-202 shall be sentenced by the court.
(2)  The sentence under this section shall be life in prison without parole or
an indeterminate prison term of not less than 25 years and which may be for
life.
